Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0620

Other considerations of directors.

Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, in considering the best interests of a limited cooperative association, a director of the association in discharging the duties of director, in conjunction with considering the long and short term interest of the association and its members, may consider any or all of:

(1) The interest of employees, customers, and suppliers of the association;

(2) The interest of the local, state, national, or world community in which the association operates;

(3) The environment; and

(4) Other cooperative principles and values that may be applied in the context of the decision.

[ 2019 c 37 s 620.]